Utah statutes.
77-19-1.   Judgment for fine or costs -- Enforcement.
If the judgment is for a fine or costs when allowed by statute and the fine is
not paid as ordered by the court, execution or garnishment may be issued as on
a judgment in a civil action. The prosecuting attorney, upon written request
of the court clerk, shall effectuate collection through execution or
garnishment when the fine or costs have not been paid as ordered by the court.
